Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.380

Cost recovery—Portion of credit card and other financial transaction costs.

The department must implement cost recovery mechanisms to recoup at least a portion of credit card and other financial transaction costs as part of charges imposed for driver and vehicle fee transactions. The department must develop a method of tracking the amount of credit card and other financial cost recovery revenues. The department must notify the state treasurer of these amounts and the state treasurer must deposit these revenues in the agency financial transaction account created in RCW 46.01.385 on a quarterly basis.

[ 2021 c 32 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 32: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2021." [ 2021 c 32 s 3.]